Colorado statutes. TITLE 1 Elections
PART 2 REGISTRATION OF ELECTORS
1-2-213. Registration at driver's license examination facilities.

The department of revenue, through its local driver's license examination facilities, shall provide each eligible elector who applies for the issuance, renewal, or correction of any type of driver's license or for an identification card pursuant to part 3 of article 2 of title 42, C.R.S., an opportunity to complete an application to register to vote, which application provides the information required under this part 2.

An applicant who wishes to complete an application for registration must provide the information required by section 1-2-204 with the exception of the information required by section 1-2-204 (2)(f.3). The applicant shall also sign the self-affirmation required by section 1-2-205.

The application for registration shall not require any information that duplicates information required in the driver's license portion of the form other than a second signature or other information necessary to assure that the applicant meets the eligibility requirements for registration. The application may require only the minimum amount of information necessary to prevent duplicate voter registrations and enable the county clerk and recorder to assess the eligibility of the applicant and to administer voter registration and other parts of the election process.

The application shall include a statement that, if an applicant declines to register to vote, the fact that the applicant has declined to register will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes, and a statement that, if an applicant does register to vote, the office at which the applicant submits a voter registration application will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes.

Applications and changes must be forwarded on a weekly basis, or on a daily basis during the last week prior to any election conducted by the county clerk and recorder, to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the applicant resides.

The department of revenue, through its local driver's license examination facilities, shall notify a program participant, as defined in section 24-30-2103 (9), C.R.S., who submits a current and valid address confidentiality program authorization card of the provisions of section 24-30-2108 (4), C.R.S., and inform the participant about how he or she may use a substitute address, as defined in section 24-30-2103 (14), C.R.S., on the driver's license or identification card.

Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk and recorder shall determine if the application is complete. If the application is complete, the applicant shall be deemed registered as of the date of application. If the application is not complete, the county clerk and recorder shall notify the applicant, stating the additional information required. The applicant shall be deemed registered as of the date of application if the additional information is provided at any time prior to the actual voting.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 94, p. 1756, § 16, effective January 1, 1995.)

The department of revenue and the secretary of state shall jointly develop an application form or process, and a change of name and address form or process, that allows an applicant wishing to register to vote to do so without duplicating any information required for the issuance, renewal, or correction of the driver's license or identification card. Any such forms must be furnished to the local driver's license examination facilities by the department of revenue.

Any registered elector who informs a driver's license examination facility of a change of name or address must have notice of the change of name or address forwarded by the driver's license examination facility to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides.

The county clerk and recorder of the county in which the elector resides shall change the registration record of the elector to reflect the change of name and address, mark the registration record as "active", and send to the elector's address of record, by forwardable mail, notice of the change and a postage paid pre-addressed return form by which the elector may verify or correct the information.

If the elector returns the form described in subsection (6)(b) of this section and indicates that the change was in error, the appropriate county clerk and recorder shall immediately correct the elector's previously updated information in the statewide voter registration database.

No information relating to the failure of an applicant for a driver's license to sign a voter registration application may be used for any purpose other than voter registration statistics.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 648, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 1398, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 2542, § 7, effective January 1, 1995; (2), (4), and (6) amended and (7) added, p. 1756, § 16, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2)(c), (2)(d), and (7) amended, p. 1736, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2)(d) amended, p. 472, § 6, effective July 1.

L. 2004:

(5) amended, p. 191, § 1, effective August 4.

L. 2007:

(2)(e) added, p. 1699, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2010:

(1) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 829, § 2, effective May 5.

L. 2011:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 11-1080), ch. 256, p. 1123, § 4, effective June 2.

L. 2013:

(2)(e) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1661, § 1, effective August 7; (2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1135), ch. 184, p. 678, § 4, effective January 1, 2014.

L. 2016:

(1), (2)(a), (2)(d), (5), and (6) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 569, § 11, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(2)(a) and (6) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1604, § 5, effective May 29.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-212.5 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-213.3. Transfer of new voter registration records from department of revenue.

In addition to the requirements of section 1-2-213 for registered electors, the department of revenue shall provide to the secretary of state, on a schedule established by the secretary of state, electronic records containing the full name, date of birth, residence address, deliverable mailing address if different from the residence address, county of residence, citizenship information for, and an electronic copy of the signature of each unregistered elector and each person eligible to preregister in accordance with section 1-2-101 (2) who provides a document that demonstrates United States citizenship and who applies for the issuance, renewal, or correction of any type of driver's license or identification card pursuant to part 3 of article 2 of title 42; except that the department of state shall not use the record of an individual who applies for or renews an identification document under part 5 of article 2 of title 42 or the record of a person who is a program participant in the "Address Confidentiality Program Act", part 21 of article 30 of title 24, for voter registration purposes.

The department of revenue shall continue to offer any person not registered to vote pursuant to subsection (2) of this section an opportunity to register to vote pursuant to section 1-2-213, unless they have provided documentation demonstrating a lack of United States citizenship.

Upon receiving an electronic record for an individual who provided documentation that confirmed his or her citizenship and contains the minimum information to register the individual to vote, the secretary of state shall provide the information to the county clerk and recorder of the county in which the person resides. Upon receipt of a record, the county clerk and recorder shall determine if the record is complete for the purposes of voter registration.

If the record is complete for purposes of voter registration or preregistration, the county clerk and recorder shall send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable mail:

If the record is for an eligible elector, notice that the elector has been registered to vote and a postage paid pre-addressed return form by which the elector may:

Decline to be registered as an elector; or

Affiliate with a political party; and

If the record is for a person eligible to preregister under section 1-2-101 (2), notice that the person has been preregistered and will be automatically registered upon turning eighteen years of age, and a postage paid preaddressed return form by which the person may:

Decline to be preregistered; or

Affiliate with a political party.

If the record is not complete, the county clerk and recorder shall send to the person's address of record, by nonforwardable mail, notice that the person has not been registered or preregistered to vote and stating the additional information required to register or preregister. If the person provides the additional information, the person is registered or preregistered to vote effective as of the date of the person's application with the department of revenue. If the person does not provide the additional information necessary to make his or her application complete and accurate within twenty-four months after the notification is mailed pursuant to this subsection (4), the person's registration is canceled.

A notice mailed under subsection (3) of this section must include an explanation, in both English and Spanish, of the eligibility requirements to register or preregister to vote, and a statement that, if the person is not eligible, the person should decline to register using the preaddressed return form.

The notice provided under subsection (3) of this section must include a statement that, if the person declines to register or preregister to vote, the fact that the person has declined will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes, and a statement that, if a person remains registered or preregistered to vote, the office at which the person was registered or preregistered will remain confidential and will be used only for voter registration statistics purposes.

If a notice provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration or preregistration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered or preregistered. If the notice is returned as undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration or preregistration is marked inactive.
(7) (a) (I) If a notice provided under subsections (3) and (4) of this section is returned as undeliverable within twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration or preregistration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered or preregistered. If the notice is returned as undeliverable after twenty days after the county clerk and recorder mails the notice, the person's registration or preregistration is marked inactive.

Notwithstanding subsection (7)(a)(I) of this section, if a person votes in an election after the transfer of the person's record but before the notice is returned as undeliverable, the person's registration shall not be canceled or marked inactive.

If a notice provided under subsection (3) of this section is not returned within twenty days, the person is registered or preregistered as of the date of the person's application at the department of revenue and the person shall be marked as unaffiliated.

If a person returns the form provided under subsection (3) of this section and declines to be registered or preregistered, including if the person returns the form and both declines to be registered or preregistered and also affiliates with a party, the person's registration or preregistration is canceled and the person is deemed to have never registered or preregistered; except that, if the person has voted in an election, the return form is of no effect and the person remains registered as of the date of the person's application with the department of revenue.

If a person returns the form provided under subsection (3) of this section and affiliates with a party, the person is registered or preregistered as of the date of the person's application with the department of revenue and the person's affiliation shall be marked effective as of the date the affiliation information was received.

If a person returns the form without marking either the option to decline or the option to affiliate with a party, the returned form is of no effect. The person is registered or preregistered as of the date of the person's application with the department of revenue and shall be marked as unaffiliated.

After the twenty-day period described in subsection (7) of this section passes, the registration information of a person registered pursuant to this section, including the fact that the person was registered through a voter registration agency, becomes a registration record that must be maintained and made available for public inspection in accordance with section 1-2-227. Information relating to the return of a notice form by a person declining to be registered or preregistered and information relating to the specific agency at which a person was registered pursuant to this section is not a public record subject to public inspection and shall not be used for any purpose other than voter registration statistics.

This section does not preclude the state from complying with its obligations under the federal "National Voter Registration Act of 1993", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20501 et seq., as amended; the federal "Voting Rights Act of 1965", 52 U.S.C. sec. 10101 et seq., as amended; the federal "Help America Vote Act of 2002", 52 U.S.C. sec. 20901 et seq., as amended; or any other applicable federal laws.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire section added, (SB 19-235), ch. 329, p. 3048, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

L. 2020:

(7)(a)(I) amended, (HB 20-1402), ch. 216, p. 1040, § 1, effective June 30.

L. 2021:

(8) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1633, § 5, effective June 21.

1-2-213.5. State institutions of higher education - electronic voter registration option - information to students.

Any state institution of higher education, as defined in section 23-1-108 (7)(g)(II), C.R.S., that utilizes an electronic course registration process shall provide to each student registering electronically for courses at the institution the opportunity to register to vote by giving each student the option to be electronically directed to the official website of the secretary of state so that he or she may register in accordance with section 1-2-202.5. The option shall be provided to students either during or immediately following the electronic registration period for each term or semester.

Each state institution of higher education subject to paragraph (a) of this subsection (1) shall implement the electronic voter registration option as soon as practicable, but not later than the next regularly scheduled maintenance to its electronic course registration system process.

Each state institution of higher education subject to subsection (1)(a) of this section shall, during the first full week of each fall semester and during the last full week of each spring semester, provide by e-mail to each enrolled student information on voter eligibility and on how to register to vote or update their voter registration information in the statewide voter registration database.

A state institution of higher education that does not utilize an electronic course registration process shall provide to students information regarding how to register to vote, including, at a minimum, prominently posting such information in a clearly visible area of the institution's registrar's office.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1147), ch. 122, p. 413, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

(1)(c) added, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1633, § 6, effective June 21.

1-2-214. Withdrawal of registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 650, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 478, § 23, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 1-2-601 in 1997.

1-2-215. Certificate of registration.

Upon the request of any eligible elector, including requests made at the time of a regular biennial or special school election, special district election, or municipal election, the county clerk and recorder shall make and deliver to the elector a certificate of registration for the elector, setting forth the facts of the elector's registration, including the date, description, and other information recorded in connection with the registration, which certificate shall be attested by the signature of the county clerk and recorder and the seal of the county.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 650, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-214 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-216. Change of address.

Any eligible elector who has moved within the state may have his or her residence changed on the registration record by submitting a letter or form furnished by the county clerk and recorder, either by mail, in person, or through the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5. The letter or form for the change must include the elector's new residence address, mailing address if different from the residence address, old address, printed name, birth date, last four digits of the elector's social security number, if the elector wishes to state them, and signature and the date.

Any address change made on the same form or personal letter as a change or withdrawal of affiliation or name change shall be accepted by the county clerk and recorder if the form or personal letter is signed indicating that the elector intended to make the change or withdrawal indicated on the form or in the personal letter.

Any eligible elector who is unable to write may request assistance from the county clerk and recorder, and the county clerk and recorder shall sign the form, witnessing the elector's mark, or the elector may have his or her mark attested to by any other person on a prescribed form or personal letter, if the request is not made at the office of the county clerk and recorder.

Any eligible elector may complete a change of address form stating, under penalty of perjury, that the elector moved before the election and that, on the day of the election, the elector will be living at the new address in the new precinct. Such change of address forms must be submitted as follows:

By appearing in-person at a voter service and polling center or clerk and recorder's office in the county in which the elector resides, at any time during which the voter service and polling center or office is open;

By submitting, on or before the eighth day before an election, an electronic change of address form through the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5; or

By submitting by mail a change of address form that is received by the elector's county clerk and recorder no later than the close of business on the eighth day before any election.

The election judges shall allow the registered elector to cast the ballot for their current residence.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2013.)

Repealed.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 651, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1399, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1152, § 8, effective July 1; (1) and (4) amended, p. 1758, § 17, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(4) amended, p. 823, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1) amended, p. 1736, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(4)(a) and (5) amended, p. 473, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(4)(a) amended, p. 758, § 8, effective May 20.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 1395, § 7, effective June 6; (3) amended, p. 1430, § 7, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(4)(c) amended, p. 1776, § 5, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (HB 09-1216), ch. 165, p. 728, § 1, effective August 5; (4)(a) amended, (HB 09-1018), ch. 158, p. 682, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 829, § 3, effective May 5.

L. 2012:

(4)(a) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 677, § 4, effective May 17.

L. 2013:

(1) and (4) amended and (5) repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 692, § 15, effective May 10.

1-2-216.5. Verification of change of address. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1759, § 18, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 823, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1737, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 567, § 29, effective May 9.

1-2-217. Change in residence after close of registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 651, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(1) amended, p. 1400, § 19, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 1760, § 19, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 824, § 14, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(2) amended, p. 1737, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 758, § 9, effective May 20.

L. 2007:

(1) amended, p. 1776, § 6, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 830, § 4, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-217.5. Change in residence before close of registration - emergency registration at office of county clerk and recorder. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1759, § 18, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(2)(a) and (2)(b) amended and (5) added, p. 824, § 15, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(1)(b) amended, p. 1466, § 1, effective June 1; (2)(b) amended, p. 1737, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1)(a), (1)(c), IP(2), (3), (4), and (5) amended, p. 1625, § 1, effective June 7.

L. 2003:

IP(1), (1)(b), (1)(c), IP(2), (2)(a), and (5) amended, p. 986, § 1, effective April 17.

L. 2004:

(1)(a) and (1)(b) amended, p. 1052, § 3, effective May 21.

L. 2005:

(1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1395, § 8, effective June 6; (1)(a) and (2) amended, p. 1430, § 8, effective June 6.

L. 2007:

(1)(b) and (2) amended, p. 1968, § 5, effective August 3.

L. 2009:

(2)(e) added, (HB 09-1205), ch. 383, p. 2078, § 1, effective August 5.

L. 2010:

(2)(a) repealed, (HB 10-1116), ch. 194, p. 830, § 5, effective May 5.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 752, § 138, effective May 10.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was repealed by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-217.7. Registration on or immediately prior to election day - locations - rules - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby declares that the intent of this section is to remove barriers to participation in the political process and make voting and registration more convenient and accessible so all citizens who want to vote have the opportunity to exercise their right to vote by allowing such persons to register to vote up to and on election day.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an elector who is not registered to vote in Colorado or who is registered to vote in Colorado but has moved within the state and needs to make a change of address may register or update his or her address immediately prior to and on election day in accordance with this section and rules adopted pursuant to this section. Upon so registering or updating his or her information, the elector is entitled to vote at any voter service and polling center in the county where the elector registered.

Timing. Voter registration within the twenty-two days prior to an election must be conducted:

For general elections, from the fifteenth day prior to and including election day, at locations designated as voter service and polling centers by county clerk and recorders pursuant to section 1-5-102.9; or

For all other elections conducted or coordinated by a county clerk and recorder or for which a county clerk and recorder is the designated election official, from the eighth day prior to and including election day, at locations designated as voter service and polling centers by county clerk and recorders pursuant to section 1-7.5-107;

By county clerk and recorders, or their designees who have received such specific training or instruction as may be provided or prescribed by the secretary of state, at the offices of the county clerk and recorders at any time during which registration is permitted at such offices; and

Through the eighth day prior to election day, via mail application, voter registration agency, local driver's license examination facility, or the online voter registration system established pursuant to section 1-2-202.5.

(3.5) Notwithstanding the deadlines specified in subsection (3) of this section, voter registration applications must be processed pursuant to section 1-2-508 (3).

Registration at voter service and polling centers.

An elector may register and vote prior to an election or on election day if the elector:

Appears in person at a voter service and polling center in the county in which the elector resides at a time when that voter service and polling center is open;

Completes and signs a voter registration application in the form prescribed by the secretary of state by rule, which application must include the questions contained in section 1-2-204 (2); and

Completes and signs the self-affirmation specified in section 1-2-205.

Repealed.

Repealed.

Change of residence at voter service and polling centers. In accordance with section 1-2-216 (4), a registered elector who has moved within the state may update his or her residence by appearing at a voter service and polling center in the elector's county of residence when the voter service and polling center is open. The elector may then vote at the voter service and polling center where the elector updated his or her information.

As soon as practicable, a county clerk and recorder shall access the statewide voter registration list maintained pursuant to section 1-2-301 (1) to add or update voter registration information when an elector registers or updates his or her information pursuant to this section. The secretary of state shall prescribe procedures to enable such additions or updates to be accomplished on an expedited basis.

The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., as may be necessary to implement this section.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 693, § 16, effective May 10.

L. 2014:

(3)(a) and (3)(c) amended and (3.5) added, (SB 14-161), ch. 160, p. 557, § 6, effective May 9.

L. 2016:

(4)(a)(II) amended and (4)(b) repealed, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 570, § 12, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(4)(a)(II) and (4)(a)(III) amended and (4)(a)(IV) repealed, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1634, § 7, effective June 21.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was added by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-218. Change of name.

Any eligible elector who has been registered in the county and who subsequently has had a name change by any legal means may have his or her name changed in the statewide voter registration system by:

Appearing before the county clerk and recorder or at a voter service and polling center at any time during which registration at those locations is permitted and submitting the change on forms prescribed by the secretary of state;

Sending a personal letter received by the county clerk and recorder at any time during which registration is permitted; or

Completing and submitting, on election day, to an election judge forms prescribed by the secretary of state.

The prescribed form or personal letter for the change must include the elector's printed former legal name, printed present legal name, birth date, last four digits of the elector's social security number, if the elector wishes to state them, and signature of present legal name and the date. Prescribed forms shall be furnished by the county clerk and recorder upon oral or written request by the elector.

A name change shall not be made by anyone other than the elector.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 652, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1400, § 20, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

Entire section amended, (HB 13-1303), ch. 185, p. 695, § 17, effective May 10.

L. 2016:

IP(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 570, § 13, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-216 as it existed prior to 1992.

Cross references:

In 2013, this section was amended by the "Voter Access and Modernized Elections Act". For the short title and the legislative declaration, see sections 1 and 2 of chapter 185, Session Laws of Colorado 2013.

1-2-218.5. Declaration of affiliation.

The declaration of affiliation of each registered elector shall remain as recorded in the registration record until the elector changes or withdraws his or her affiliation.

Any eligible elector who has not declared an affiliation with a political party or political organization must be designated on the registration records of the county clerk and recorder as "unaffiliated". Any unaffiliated eligible elector may, but is not required to, declare a political party affiliation when the elector desires to vote at a primary election, or the elector may declare his or her political party or political organization affiliation at any other time during which electors are permitted to register by submitting a letter or a form furnished by the county clerk and recorder, by mail, in person, or online in accordance with section 1-2-202.5. An unaffiliated eligible elector need not declare an affiliation to vote in a presidential primary election.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire section added, p. 158, § 3, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1308, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 570, § 14, effective May 18.

Initiated 2016:

(2) amended, Proposition 107, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2819; (2) amended, Proposition 108, effective upon proclamation of the Governor, December 27, 2016. See L. 2017, p. 2822.

1-2-219. Changing or withdrawing declaration of affiliation.

Any eligible elector desiring to change or withdraw the elector's affiliation may do so by completing and signing a prescribed request for the change or withdrawal and filing it with the county clerk and recorder or by submitting a personal letter written by the elector to the county clerk and recorder at any time up to and including the twenty-second day preceding a primary election; except that, if the twenty-second day before the primary election is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the change or withdrawal applies if made by the next day that is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday. The prescribed form or personal letter for the change must include the elector's printed name, address within the county, birth date, the last four digits of the elector's social security number, if the elector wishes to state it, and signature, the date, the elector's previous affiliation status, and the requested change in affiliation status. A prescribed form must be furnished by the county clerk and recorder upon the elector's oral or written request. Upon receiving the request, the county clerk and recorder shall change the elector's affiliation on his or her registration record. If the affiliation is withdrawn, the designation on the elector's registration record must be changed to "unaffiliated". If an elector changes affiliation, the elector is entitled to vote, at any primary election, only the ballot of the political party to which the elector is currently affiliated. A change or withdrawal of affiliation may not be made by anyone other than the elector. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a declaration or change of affiliation made by an unaffiliated elector in accordance with this section must be deferred if the elector has already been mailed a primary election ballot packet. The deadline by which the elector must declare, change, or withdraw an affiliation as specified in this subsection (1) only applies to a primary election and does not apply to a general or coordinated election.

Any declaration, change, or withdrawal of affiliation made on the same form or personal letter as an address or name change shall be accepted by the county clerk and recorder if the form or personal letter is dated and signed so that it is clearly indicated that the elector intended to make the change or withdrawal indicated on the form or in the personal letter. An elector who is unable to write may request assistance from the county clerk and recorder, and the county clerk and recorder shall sign the form, witnessing the elector's mark or, on a personal letter, the elector shall have his or her signature attested to by a notary public.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 652, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1401, § 21, effective July 1.

L. 99:

(1) amended, p. 158, § 4, effective August 4.

L. 2003:

(1) amended, p. 1309, § 3, effective April 22.

L. 2016:

(1) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 571, § 15, effective May 18.

L. 2018:

(1) amended, (SB 18-233), ch. 262, p. 1605, § 6, effective May 29.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1634, § 8, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-217 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-220. Loss of party affiliation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 653, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 824, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 165, § 28, effective August 4.

1-2-221. Continuation of affiliation. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 653, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1402, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section repealed, p. 165, § 28, effective August 4.

1-2-222. Errors in recording of affiliation.

If an elector goes to the elector's legal voting place to vote at any primary election or to the office of the county clerk and recorder and contends that an error has been made in the recording of the elector's affiliation in the statewide voter registration system or that the affiliation has been unlawfully changed or withdrawn, the election judges or the county clerk and recorder shall allow the elector to make and sign an affidavit, which shall be substantially in the form provided in subsection (4) of this section. Any election judge or the county clerk and recorder has authority to administer the oath and take the acknowledgment of the elector's affidavit. When the affidavit is completed, the county clerk and recorder shall make the change as specified in the affidavit using the date provided by the elector on the affidavit as the new affiliation date.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 99, p. 159, § 5, effective August 4, 1999.)

For the purposes of determining the eligibility of candidates for nomination in accordance with sections 1-4-601 (4)(a) and 1-4-801 (4), the eligibility of persons to vote at any precinct caucus, assembly, or convention in accordance with section 1-3-101, or the eligibility of persons to sign petitions in accordance with section 1-4-801 (2), the date of declaration of the party affiliation of the elector must be the date which the elector alleges by affidavit to be the correct date of affiliation.

Printed affidavit forms must be furnished to the election judges of the various election precincts. The affidavit form must be substantially as follows:

STATE OF COLORADO
)
) ss.
County of ...........................................................)
I, ...................., believing an error has been made as to the recording of my party affiliation, or a change unlawfully made, or a withdrawal unlawfully made in the statewide voter registration system, do solemnly swear, or affirm, that the party affiliation as now shown in the statewide voter registration system is an error, or has been unlawfully changed, or has been unlawfully withdrawn and that my correct party affiliation should be .................... instead of .................... and request that the party affiliation be corrected in the statewide voter registration system. My correct affiliation was made on or before .................... (date).
Dated ....................
Signed ....................
Subscribed and sworn to before me this ........... day of ..............., 20....
..................................................................
Election Judge or County Clerk
County ......................................................

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 654, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(3) amended, p. 1765, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 99:

(1) and (2) amended, p. 159, § 5, effective August 4.

L. 2016:

(1) and (4) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 571, § 16, effective May 18.

L. 2021:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, (SB 21-250), ch. 282, p. 1634, § 9, effective June 21.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-220 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-223. Names transferred when precinct boundaries changed.

In case any new election precinct is formed within a county or in case of the division of any existing precinct, the precinct number on the voter's master file record shall be changed to reflect the new precinct number.

In case any change is made in precinct boundaries as a result of annexation affecting county boundaries, the county clerk and recorder of the annexing county shall update in the statewide voter registration system the registration records of all electors residing in the annexed territory as soon as practicable. The registrations are considered as continuing registrations with all the registered electors involved having full rights and privileges as if no change in county boundaries had occurred.

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 656, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 473, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2012:

(2) amended, (HB 12-1292), ch. 181, p. 677, § 5, effective May 17.

L. 2016:

(2) amended, (SB 16-142), ch. 173, p. 572, § 17, effective May 18.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 1-2-221 as it existed prior to 1992.

1-2-224. Canceling registration. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 92:

Entire article R&RE, p. 656, § 2, effective January 1, 1993.

L. 93:

(6)(a) amended and (9) added, p. 1403, § 23, effective July 1.

L. 94:

(6)(a) and (7) amended, p. 1152, § 9, effective July 1; (1)(a), (2)(a)(II), (5)(a), (5)(b)(II), (6), and (9) amended, p. 1760, § 20, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(1)(a), IP(2), and (9) amended, p. 825, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 96:

(3.5) added, p. 1738, § 18, effective July 1.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 478, § 23, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section was relocated to § 1-2-605 in 1997.